Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201281-187
Legislative Fiscal Analyst; receive
copy of estimates, reports, and allocation requests.

A copy
of all estimates, reports, and allocation requests required by the Deferred
Building Renewal Act shall be submitted electronically to
the Legislative Fiscal Analyst upon his or her request.

Laws 1977, LB 309, § 15;

Laws 1985, LB 2, § 6;

Laws 1998, LB 1129, § 18;

Laws 2012, LB782, § 166.
July 19, 2012